Utah statutes.
78B-15-201.   Establishment of parent-child relationship.

(1)  The mother-child relationship is established between a woman and a child by:

(a)  the woman's having given birth to the child, except as otherwise provided in Part 8, Gestational Agreement;

(b)  an adjudication of the woman's maternity;

(c)  adoption of the child by the woman; or

(d)  an adjudication confirming the woman as a parent of a child born to a gestational mother if the agreement was validated under Part 8, Gestational Agreement, or is enforceable under other law.

(2)  The father-child relationship is established between a man and a child by:

(a)  an unrebutted presumption of the man's paternity of the child under Section 78B-15-204;

(b)  an effective declaration of paternity by the man under Part 3, Voluntary Declaration of Paternity, unless the declaration has been rescinded or successfully challenged;

(c)  an adjudication of the man's paternity;

(d)  adoption of the child by the man;

(e)  the man having consented to assisted reproduction by a woman under Part 7, Assisted Reproduction, which resulted in the birth of the child; or

(f)  an adjudication confirming the man as a parent of a child born to a gestational mother if the agreement was validated under Part 8, Gestational Agreement, or is enforceable under other law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

